test/src/gt-desc-yamls/A-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
  Adjectives:
      ergas+A+Pl+Abe: erksateta
      ergas+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: erksatetagi
      ergas+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastetagi
      ergas+A+Pl+Abe+Usage/NotNorm: ergasteta
      ergas+A+Pl+Abl: erksatelt
      ergas+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: erksateltki
      ergas+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergasteltki
      ergas+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: erksailtki
      ergas+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/NotNorm: ergastelt
      ergas+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: erksailt
      ergas+A+Pl+Ade: erksatel
      ergas+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: erksatelgi
      ergas+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastelgi
      ergas+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: erksailgi
      ergas+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/NotNorm: ergastel
      ergas+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: erksail
      ergas+A+Pl+All: erksatele
      ergas+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: erksatelegi
      ergas+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastelegi
      ergas+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: erksailegi
      ergas+A+Pl+All+Usage/NotNorm: ergastele
      ergas+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: erksaile
      ergas+A+Pl+Com: erksatega
      ergas+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: erksategagi
      ergas+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastegagi
      ergas+A+Pl+Com+Usage/NotNorm: ergastega
      ergas+A+Pl+Ela: erksatest
      ergas+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: erksatestki
      ergas+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastestki
      ergas+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: erksaistki
      ergas+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/NotNorm: ergastest
      ergas+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: erksaist
      ergas+A+Pl+Ess: erksatena
      ergas+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: erksatenagi
      ergas+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastenagi
      ergas+A+Pl+Ess+Usage/NotNorm: ergastena
      ergas+A+Pl+Gen: erksate
      ergas+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: erksategi
      ergas+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastegi
      ergas+A+Pl+Gen+Usage/NotNorm: ergaste
      ergas+A+Pl+Ill: erksatesse
      ergas+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: erksatessegi
      ergas+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastessegi
      ergas+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: erksaissegi
      ergas+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/NotNorm: ergastesse
      ergas+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: erksaisse
      ergas+A+Pl+Ine: erksates
      ergas+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: erksateski
      ergas+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergasteski
      ergas+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: erksaiski
      ergas+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/NotNorm: ergastes
      ergas+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: erksais
      ergas+A+Pl+Nom: erksad
      ergas+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: erksadki
      ergas+A+Pl+Par: erksaid
      ergas+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: erksaidki
      ergas+A+Pl+Tra: erksateks
      ergas+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: erksatekski
      ergas+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastekski
      ergas+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: erksaikski
      ergas+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/NotNorm: ergasteks
      ergas+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: erksaiks
      ergas+A+Pl+Trm: erksateni
      ergas+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: erksatenigi
      ergas+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: ergastenigi
      ergas+A+Pl+Trm+Usage/NotNorm: ergasteni
      ergas+A+Sg+Abe: erksata
      ergas+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: erksatagi
      ergas+A+Sg+Abl: erksalt
      ergas+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: erksaltki
      ergas+A+Sg+Ade: erksal
      ergas+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: erksalgi
      ergas+A+Sg+All: erksale
      ergas+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: erksalegi
      ergas+A+Sg+Com: erksaga
      ergas+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: erksagagi
      ergas+A+Sg+Ela: erksast
      ergas+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: erksastki
      ergas+A+Sg+Ess: erksana
      ergas+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: erksanagi
      ergas+A+Sg+Gen: erksa
      ergas+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: erksagi
      ergas+A+Sg+Ill: erksasse
      ergas+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: erksassegi
      ergas+A+Sg+Ine: erksas
      ergas+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: erksaski
      ergas+A+Sg+Nom: ergas
      ergas+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: ergaski
      ergas+A+Sg+Par: erksat
      ergas+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: erksatki
      ergas+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: ergastki
      ergas+A+Sg+Par+Usage/Rare: ergast
      ergas+A+Sg+Tra: erksaks
      ergas+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: erksakski
      ergas+A+Sg+Trm: erksani
      ergas+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: erksanigi
      hale+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: haledatetagi
      hale+A+Pl+Abe: haledateta
      hale+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: haledateltki
      hale+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: haledailtki
      hale+A+Pl+Abl: haledatelt
      hale+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: haledailt
      hale+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: haledatelgi
      hale+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: haledailgi
      hale+A+Pl+Ade: haledatel
      hale+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: haledail
      hale+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: haledatelegi
      hale+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: haledailegi
      hale+A+Pl+All: haledatele
      hale+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: haledaile
      hale+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: haledategagi
      hale+A+Pl+Com: haledatega
      hale+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: haledatestki
      hale+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: haledaistki
      hale+A+Pl+Ela: haledatest
      hale+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: haledaist
      hale+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: haledatenagi
      hale+A+Pl+Ess: haledatena
      hale+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: haledategi
      hale+A+Pl+Gen: haledate
      hale+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: haledatessegi
      hale+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: haledaissegi
      hale+A+Pl+Ill: haledatesse
      hale+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: haledaisse
      hale+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: haledateski
      hale+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: haledaiski
      hale+A+Pl+Ine: haledates
      hale+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: haledais
      hale+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: haledadki
      hale+A+Pl+Nom: haledad
      hale+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: haledaidki
      hale+A+Pl+Par: haledaid
      hale+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: haledatekski
      hale+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: haledaikski
      hale+A+Pl+Tra: haledateks
      hale+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: haledaiks
      hale+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: haledatenigi
      hale+A+Pl+Trm: haledateni
      hale+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: haledatagi
      hale+A+Sg+Abe: haledata
      hale+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: haledaltki
      hale+A+Sg+Abl: haledalt
      hale+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: haledalgi
      hale+A+Sg+Ade: haledal
      hale+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: haledalegi
      hale+A+Sg+All: haledale
      hale+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: haledagagi
      hale+A+Sg+Com: haledaga
      hale+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: haledastki
      hale+A+Sg+Ela: haledast
      hale+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: haledanagi
      hale+A+Sg+Ess: haledana
      hale+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: haledagi
      hale+A+Sg+Gen: haleda
      hale+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: haledassegi
      hale+A+Sg+Ill: haledasse
      hale+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: haledaski
      hale+A+Sg+Ine: haledas
      hale+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: halegi
      hale+A+Sg+Nom: hale
      hale+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: haledatki
      hale+A+Sg+Par: haledat
      hale+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: haledakski
      hale+A+Sg+Tra: haledaks
      hale+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: haledanigi
      hale+A+Sg+Trm: haledani
      hea+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: headetagi
      hea+A+Pl+Abe: headeta
      hea+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: headeltki
      hea+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: häiltki
      hea+A+Pl+Abl: headelt
      hea+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: häilt
      hea+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: headelgi
      hea+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: häilgi
      hea+A+Pl+Ade: headel
      hea+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: häil
      hea+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: headelegi
      hea+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: häilegi
      hea+A+Pl+All: headele
      hea+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: häile
      hea+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: headegagi
      hea+A+Pl+Com: headega
      hea+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: headestki
      hea+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: häistki
      hea+A+Pl+Ela: headest
      hea+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: häist
      hea+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: headenagi
      hea+A+Pl+Ess: headena
      hea+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: headegi
      hea+A+Pl+Gen: heade
      hea+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: headessegi
      hea+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: häissegi
      hea+A+Pl+Ill: headesse
      hea+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: häisse
      hea+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: headeski
      hea+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: häiski
      hea+A+Pl+Ine: heades
      hea+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: häis
      hea+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: headki
      hea+A+Pl+Nom: head
      hea+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: häidki
      hea+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: heasidki
      hea+A+Pl+Par: häid
      hea+A+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: heasid
      hea+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: headekski
      hea+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: häikski
      hea+A+Pl+Tra: headeks
      hea+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: häiks
      hea+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: headenigi
      hea+A+Pl+Trm: headeni
      hea+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: heatagi
      hea+A+Sg+Abe: heata
      hea+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: healtki
      hea+A+Sg+Abl: healt
      hea+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: healgi
      hea+A+Sg+Ade: heal
      hea+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: healegi
      hea+A+Sg+All: heale
      hea+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: heagagi
      hea+A+Sg+Com: heaga
      hea+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: heastki
      hea+A+Sg+Ela: heast
      hea+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: heanagi
      hea+A+Sg+Ess: heana
      hea+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: heagi
      hea+A+Sg+Gen: hea
      hea+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: heassegi
      hea+A+Sg+Ill: heasse
      hea+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: heaski
      hea+A+Sg+Ine: heas
      hea+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: heagi
      hea+A+Sg+Nom: hea
      hea+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: headki
      hea+A+Sg+Par: head
      hea+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: heakski
      hea+A+Sg+Tra: heaks
      hea+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: heanigi
      hea+A+Sg+Trm: heani
      hirmus+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: hirmsatetagi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Abe: hirmsateta
      hirmus+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: hirmsateltki
      hirmus+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: hirmsailtki
      hirmus+A+Pl+Abl: hirmsatelt
      hirmus+A+Pl+Abl+Usage/Rare: hirmsailt
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: hirmsatelgi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: hirmsailgi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ade: hirmsatel
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: hirmsail
      hirmus+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi: hirmsatelegi
      hirmus+A+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: hirmsailegi
      hirmus+A+Pl+All: hirmsatele
      hirmus+A+Pl+All+Usage/Rare: hirmsaile
      hirmus+A+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: hirmsategagi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Com: hirmsatega
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: hirmsatestki
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: hirmsaistki
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ela: hirmsatest
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ela+Usage/Rare: hirmsaist
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: hirmsatenagi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ess: hirmsatena
      hirmus+A+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: hirmsategi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Gen: hirmsate
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: hirmsatessegi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: hirmsaissegi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ill: hirmsatesse
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ill+Usage/Rare: hirmsaisse
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: hirmsateski
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: hirmsaiski
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ine: hirmsates
      hirmus+A+Pl+Ine+Usage/Rare: hirmsais
      hirmus+A+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: hirmsadki
      hirmus+A+Pl+Nom: hirmsad
      hirmus+A+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: hirmsaidki
      hirmus+A+Pl+Par: hirmsaid
      hirmus+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: hirmsatekski
      hirmus+A+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Usage/Rare: hirmsaikski
      hirmus+A+Pl+Tra: hirmsateks
      hirmus+A+Pl+Tra+Usage/Rare: hirmsaiks
      hirmus+A+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: hirmsatenigi
      hirmus+A+Pl+Trm: hirmsateni
      hirmus+A+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: hirmsatagi
      hirmus+A+Sg+Abe: hirmsata
      hirmus+A+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: hirmsaltki
      hirmus+A+Sg+Abl: hirmsalt
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: hirmsalgi
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ade: hirmsal
      hirmus+A+Sg+All+Foc/gi: hirmsalegi
      hirmus+A+Sg+All: hirmsale
      hirmus+A+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: hirmsagagi
      hirmus+A+Sg+Com: hirmsaga
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: hirmsastki
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ela: hirmsast
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: hirmsanagi
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ess: hirmsana
      hirmus+A+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: hirmsagi
      hirmus+A+Sg+Gen: hirmsa
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: hirmsassegi
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ill: hirmsasse
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: hirmsaski
      hirmus+A+Sg+Ine: hirmsas
      hirmus+A+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: hirmuski
      hirmus+A+Sg+Nom: hirmus
      hirmus+A+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: hirmsatki
      hirmus+A+Sg+Par: hirmsat
      hirmus+A+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: hirmsakski
      hirmus+A+Sg+Tra: hirmsaks
      hirmus+A+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: hirmsanigi
      hirmus+A+Sg+Trm: hirmsani
      hoolas+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: hoolsatetagi
      hoolas+A+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: hoolastetagi
      hoolas+A+Pl+Abe: hoolsateta
      hoolas+A+Pl+Abe+Usage/NotNorm: hoolasteta
      hoolas+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: hoolsateltki
      hoolas+A+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Usage/NotNorm: hoolasteltki
